Utah statutes.
62A-17-105.   Other state agencies and local governments.

(1)  A state agency or local government institution that provides health and human services, or a public or private entity receiving state-appropriated funds to provide health and human services, shall provide Utah 211 with information, in a form determined by Utah 211, about the services the agency or entity provides for inclusion in the statewide information and referral system.

(2)  A state agency or local government institution that provides health and human services may not establish a new public telephone line or hotline, other than an emergency first responder hotline, to provide information or referrals unless the agency or institution first:

(a)  consults with Utah 211 about using the existing 211 to provide access to the information or referrals; and

(b)  assesses whether a new line or the existing 211 program would be more cost effective.

(3)  Nothing in this section prohibits a state agency or local government institution from starting a public telephone line or hotline in an emergency situation.

(4)  State agencies, local governments, community-based organizations, not-for-profit organizations, faith-based organizations, and businesses that engage in providing human services may contract with Utah 211 to provide specialized projects, including:

(a)  public health campaigns;

(b)  seasonal community services; and

(c)  expanded point of entry services.



Enacted by Chapter 24, 2013 General Session

